Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 901, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 901. The A. In municipalities with a population of one
hundred thousand (100,000) or less, according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census, the Transportation Commission shall pay the cost
of or perform the act of constructing, improving or maintaining
municipal streets where such streets are a continuation of the state
HB1125 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

or f ederal highway system and the cost of installation, repair and
maintenance of curbs, inlets, inlet grates, inlet hoods, and inlet
structures, signs, and lane marking for municipal streets where such
streets are a continuation of the state or federal highway system,
except when performing mill and inlay projects. The Commission
shall not pay the cost of mowing the right-of-way; stormwater
drainage systems and facilities outside the back of curb; or curbs,
sidewalks or driveways of any such street. When a municipality
performs construction or maintenance operations within the right-of-
way which affects or involves the removal of the surface, grade or
subgrade of the highway, the municipality shall, at the expense of
the municipality, restore the surface, grade or subgrade of the
highway in accordance with the standards and specifications set
forth by the Department of Transportation. If the municipality
fails to restore the surface, grade or subgrade of the highway in
accordance with the standards and specifications set forth by the
Department of Transportation, the Department of Transportation shall
restore the highway and charge the municipality for all expenses
associated therewith. The Commission may participate in or pay the
cost of lighting and electronic traffic control devices for
municipal streets where such streets are a continuation of the state
or federal highway system.
B. When the Department undertakes a project as described in
subsection A of this section, the Department shall bear the full
HB1125 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

cost of installing, repairing, replacing, or otherwise maintaining
curbs, inlets, inlet grates, inlet hoods, and inlet structures as
part of the project scope. The Department shall amend all existing
administrative rules that exclude the installation, repair,
replacement, or otherwise maintenance of curbs in the scope of such
projects.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.















HB1125 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.